District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-207.01

Policy.

Repealed.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 701, 29 DCR 1060
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 502(g), 42 DCR 3684
1981 Ed., § 3-207.1.

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 502(f) of Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 10-253, March 23, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 1652).

For temporary repeal of subchapter, see § 502(f) of the Multiyear Budget Spending Reduction and Support Emergency Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-389, December 29, 1994, 42 DCR 197).
For temporary repeal of subchapter, see § 502(g) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).